District of Columbia statutes.
22-3809

Parole; discharge.

Any person committed under this chapter may be released from confinement when an appropriate supervisory official finds that he or she has sufficiently recovered so as to not be dangerous to other persons, provided if the person to be released be one charged with crime or undergoing sentence therefor, that official shall give notice thereof to the judge of the criminal court and deliver him or her to the court in obedience to proper precept.

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 349, ch. 428, title II, § 207
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(t)(2)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 20(g), 41 DCR 1639
Sex offenders, persons required to register, see § 24-4102.
This section is referenced in § 22-3808 and § 22-3810.
1981 Ed., § 22-3509.
1973 Ed., § 22-3509.